Utah statutes.
63M-1-3304.   Creation of office and appointment of director -- Purposes of office.

(1)  There is created within the Governor's Office of Economic Development an Outdoor Recreation Office.

(2) (a)  The executive director shall appoint a director of the office.

(b)  The director shall report to the executive director and may appoint staff.

(3)  The purposes of the office are to:

(a)  coordinate outdoor recreation policy, management, and promotion:

(i)  among state and federal agencies and local government entities in the state; and

(ii)  with the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office created in Section 63J-4-602, if public land is involved;

(b)  promote economic development by:

(i)  coordinating with outdoor recreation stakeholders;

(ii)  improving recreational opportunities; and

(iii)  recruiting outdoor recreation business;

(c)  recommend to the governor and Legislature policies and initiatives to enhance recreational amenities and experiences in the state and help implement those policies and initiatives;

(d)  develop data regarding the impacts of outdoor recreation in the state; and

(e)  promote the health and social benefits of outdoor recreation, especially to young people.



Enacted by Chapter 25, 2013 General Session

